Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3918.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF CHASKA; TAX INCREMENT FINANCING DISTRICT NO. 23.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 469.176, subdivision 1b, the Chaska Economic Development Authority may collect tax increment from Chaska Tax Increment Financing District No. 23 for up to 35 years after receipt of the first increment. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon compliance by the governing bodies of the city of Chaska, Carver County, and Independent School District No. 112 with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.1782, subdivision 2. new text end